Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
State Law Library

27A.200.
State law library created — Appointment of librarian.

There is created, in the Administrative Office of the Courts, a state law library which shall be under the supervision, management, and control of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice designated by the Chief Justice.

The administrative assistant shall appoint a state law librarian who shall:

Serve at the pleasure of the Chief Justice;

Appoint such assistant state law librarians and other employees as shall be necessary;

Manage the state law library and perform such other tasks as may be assigned relative thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 8.

27A.210.
Books and records.

The following books and records shall be maintained by the State Law Library:

All copies of Volumes 1 to 77 of the Kentucky Reports;

Twenty-five (25) copies each of Volumes 78 to 314 of the Kentucky Reports;

Two (2) sets of all future publications of the journals and nine (9) sets of the Acts of the General Assembly; and

Two (2) sets of the official Kentucky statute publications.

The state law librarian shall arrange with the proper official of each state of the United States and of the United States and its territories for the exchanges of the statutes and the acts of the legislatures of each state and of Congress. When an exchange is agreed upon, the state law librarian shall send to the officer one (1) copy of the Acts of the General Assembly and one (1) set of statutes as soon as they are ready for distribution.

Copies of acts, statutes, and other materials required to be kept by the state law librarian and to be made available for exchange shall be furnished to the state law librarian, without charge, by the agency or official responsible for the distribution of same.

The state law librarian may arrange for the distribution or disposal of materials held by the State Law Library upon concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations.

The state law librarian may acquire, by purchase, exchange, donation, or otherwise, books and other materials the librarian deems suitable for the holdings of the State Law Library.

The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, sell any surplus books in the State Law Library that have a market value, collect the funds received therefor, and deposit them in the “State Law Library Surplus Books Fund,” which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The “State Law Library Surplus Books Fund” shall not lapse. The state law librarian may reinvest the funds in other books and materials that the librarian deems suitable for the holdings of the State Law Library. The provisions of KRS 45A.045(5) concerning the powers and duties of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not apply to sales made by the state law librarian under this section.

The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, offer and provide technical and other assistance to county law libraries and to other publicly funded law libraries.

The state law librarian may, upon the request of a county law library or other publicly funded law library and with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, purchase books, supplies, or other materials for the library. The funds used for these purposes shall be those of the county law library or other publicly funded law library.

The state law librarian shall issue, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, regulations for the operation, management, and lending policy of the State Law Library.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 9; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 7; 1982, ch. 316, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 496, § 26, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 14, effective May 30, 1997.